Utah statutes.
10-9a-602.   Planning commission preparation and recommendation of subdivision ordinance -- Adoption or rejection by legislative body.

(1)  The planning commission shall:

(a)  prepare and recommend a proposed ordinance to the legislative body that regulates the subdivision of land;

(b)  prepare and recommend or consider and recommend a proposed ordinance that amends the regulation of the subdivision of the land in the municipality;

(c)  provide notice consistent with Section 10-9a-205; and

(d)  hold a public hearing on the proposed ordinance before making its final recommendation to the legislative body.

(2)  The municipal legislative body may adopt or reject the ordinance either as proposed by the planning commission or after making any revision the legislative body considers appropriate.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

